Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201644-2703
Coverages authorized.

(1)(a) The Nebraska Life and Health Insurance Guaranty Association Act
shall provide coverage for the policies and contracts specified in subsection
(2) of this section:

(i) To persons who, regardless of where they reside, except for nonresident
certificate holders under group policies or contracts, are the beneficiaries,
assignees, or payees of the persons covered under subdivision (1)(a)(ii) of
this section; and

(ii) To persons who are owners of or certificate holders under the policies
or contracts, other than structured settlement annuities, and in each case
who:

(A) Are residents; or

(B) Are not residents and all of the following conditions apply:

(I) The insurer that issued the policies or contracts is domiciled in
this state;

(II) The states in which the persons reside have associations similar
to the association created by the act; and

(III) The persons are not eligible for coverage by an association in
any other state due to the fact that the insurer was not licensed in the state
at the time specified in the state's guaranty association law.

(b) For structured settlement annuities specified in subsection (2)
of this section, subdivisions (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section do not apply.
The act shall, except as provided in subdivisions (1)(c) and (d) of this section,
provide coverage to a person who is a payee under a structured settlement
annuity, or beneficiary of a payee if the payee is deceased, if the payee:

(i) Is a resident, regardless of where the contract owner resides; or

(ii) Is not a resident, but only under the following conditions:

(A)(I) The contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is a
resident; or

(II) The contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is not
a resident, but the insurer that issued the structured settlement annuity
is domiciled in this state and the state in which the contract owner resides
has an association similar to the association created by the act; and

(B) The payee or beneficiary and the contract owner are not eligible
for coverage by the association of the state in which the payee or contract
owner resides.

(c) The act shall not provide coverage to a person who is a payee or
beneficiary of a contract owner resident of this state if the payee or beneficiary
is afforded any coverage by the association of another state.

(d) The act is intended to provide coverage to a person who is a resident
of this state and, in special circumstances, to a nonresident. To avoid duplicate
coverage, if a person who would otherwise receive coverage under the act is
provided coverage under the laws of any other state, the person shall not
be provided coverage under the act. In determining the application of the
provisions of this subdivision in situations in which a person could be covered
by the association of more than one state, whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary,
or assignee, the act shall be construed in conjunction with other state laws
to result in coverage by only one association.

(2)(a) The act shall provide coverage to the persons specified in subsection
(1) of this section for direct nongroup life, health, or annuity policies
or contracts and supplemental contracts to any of these and for certificates
under direct group policies and contracts, except as limited by the act. Annuity
contracts and certificates under group annuity contracts include allocated
funding agreements, structured settlement annuities, and any immediate or
deferred annuity contracts.

(b) The act shall not apply to:

(i) Any portion of any policy or contract not guaranteed by the insurer
or under which the risk is borne by the policy or contract holder;

(ii) A policy or contract of reinsurance, unless assumption certificates
have been issued pursuant to the reinsurance policy or contract;

(iii) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the rate
of interest on which it is based or the interest rate, crediting rate, or
similar factor determined by use of an index or other external reference stated
in the policy or contract employed in calculating returns or changes in value:

(A) Averaged over the period of four years prior to the date on which
the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under the act,
whichever is earlier, exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting
two percentage points from Moody's corporate bond yield average averaged for
that same four-year period or for such lesser period if the policy or contract
was issued less than four years before the member insurer becomes an impaired
or insolvent insurer under the act, whichever is earlier; and

(B) On and after the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired
or insolvent insurer under the act, whichever is earlier, exceeds the rate
of interest determined by subtracting three percentage points from Moody's
corporate bond yield average as most recently available;

(iv) A portion of a policy or contract issued to a plan or program of
an employer, association, or other person to provide life, health, or annuity
benefits to its employees, members, or others, to the extent that the plan
or program is self-funded or uninsured, including benefits payable by an employer,
association, or other person under:

(A) A multiple employer welfare arrangement as described in 29 U.S.C. 1002(40);

(B) A minimum premium group insurance plan;

(C) A stop-loss group insurance plan; or

(D) An administrative services only contract;

(v) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that it provides
for:

(A) Dividends or experience rating credits;

(B) Voting rights; or

(C) Payment of any fees or allowances to any person, including the policy
or contract owner, in connection with the service to or administration of
the policy or contract;

(vi) A policy or contract issued in this state by a member insurer at
a time when it was not licensed or did not have a certificate of authority
to issue the policy or contract in this state;

(vii) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the assessments
required by section 44-2708 with respect to the policy or contract are preempted
by federal or state law;

(viii) An obligation that does not arise under the express written terms
of the policy or contract issued by the insurer to the contract owner or policy
owner, including:

(A) Claims based on marketing materials;

(B) Claims based on side letters, riders, or other documents that were
issued by the insurer without meeting applicable policy form, filing, or approval
requirements;

(C) Misrepresentations of or regarding policy benefits;

(D) Extra-contractual claims; or

(E) A claim for penalties or consequential or incidental damages;

(ix) A contractual agreement that establishes the member insurer's obligations
to provide a book value accounting guaranty for defined contribution benefit
plan participants by reference to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the
benefit plan or its trustee, which in each case is not an affiliate of the
member insurer;

(x) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent it provides for
interest or other changes in value to be determined by the use of an index
or other external reference stated in the policy or contract, but which have
not been credited to the policy or contract or as to which the policy or contract
owner's rights are subject to forfeiture as of the date the member insurer
becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under the act, whichever is earlier.
If a policy's or contract's interest or changes in value are credited less
frequently than annually, then for purposes of determining the values that
have been credited and are not subject to forfeiture under this subdivision,
the interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined
in the policy or contract will be credited as if the contractual date of crediting
interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency, whichever
is earlier, and will not be subject to forfeiture;

(xi) An unallocated annuity contract, a funding agreement, a guaranteed
interest contract, a guaranteed investment contract, a synthetic guaranteed
investment contract, or a deposit administration contract;

(xii) Any such policy or contract issued by:

(A) A nonprofit hospital or medical service organization;

(B) A health maintenance organization unless such organization is controlled
by an insurance company licensed by the Department of Insurance under Chapter
44;

(C) A fraternal benefit society;

(D) A mandatory state pooling plan;

(E) An unincorporated mutual association;

(F) An assessment association operating under Chapter 44 which issues
only policies or contracts subject to assessment; or

(G) A reciprocal or interinsurance exchange which issues only policies
or contracts subject to assessment;

(xiii) Any policy or contract issued by any person, corporation, or
organization which is not licensed by the Department of Insurance under Chapter
44;

(xiv) A policy or contract
providing any hospital, medical, prescription drug, or other health care benefits
pursuant to Title 42, Chapter 7, Subchapter XVIII, Part C or D of the United
States Code or any regulations issued pursuant thereto; or

(xv) A viatical settlement
contract as defined in section 44-1102 or a viaticated policy as defined in
section 44-1102.

(3) The benefits that the association
may become obligated to cover shall in no event exceed the lesser of:

(a) The contractual obligations for which the insurer is liable or would
have been liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent insurer; or

(b)(i) With respect to one life, regardless of the number of policies
or contracts:

(A) Three hundred thousand dollars in life insurance death benefits,
but not more than one hundred thousand dollars in net cash surrender and net
cash withdrawal values for life insurance;

(B) In health
insurance benefits: (I) Five
hundred thousand dollars for basic hospital, medical, or surgical insurance
or major medical insurance. For purposes of this subdivision: Basic hospital,
medical, or surgical insurance means a policy which pays a certain portion
of hospital room and board costs each day. This type of policy also pays for
hospital services and supplies including X-rays, lab tests, medicine, and
other items up to a stated amount; and major medical insurance means health
insurance to finance the expense of major illness and injury characterized
by large benefit maximums and reimburses the major part of all charges for
hospitals, doctors, private nurses, medical appliances, prescribed out-of-hospital
treatment, drugs, and medicines above an initial deductible; (II) three hundred
thousand dollars for disability insurance or long-term care insurance as defined
in section 44-4509. For purposes of this subdivision, disability insurance
means the type of policy which pays a monthly or weekly amount if an individual
is disabled and cannot work; and (III) one hundred thousand dollars for coverages
not defined as disability insurance, long-term care insurance, basic hospital,
medical, or surgical insurance, or major medical insurance, including any
net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values; or

(C) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars in the present value
of annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal
values;

(ii) With respect to each payee of a structured settlement annuity or
beneficiary or beneficiaries of the payee if deceased, two hundred fifty thousand dollars in
the present value of annuity benefits, in the aggregate, including net cash
surrender and net cash withdrawal values, if any;

(iii) The association shall not be obligated to cover more than:

(A) An aggregate of three hundred thousand dollars in benefits with
respect to any one life under subdivisions (3)(b)(i)
and (ii) of this section, except that with respect to benefits
for basic hospital, medical, or surgical insurance
and major medical insurance under subdivision (3)(b)(i)(B)(I) of
this section, in which case the aggregate liability of the association shall
not exceed five hundred thousand dollars with respect to any one individual;
or

(B) With respect to one owner of multiple nongroup policies of life
insurance, whether the policy owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or
other person and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees,
or other persons, more than five million dollars in benefits regardless of
the number of policies and contracts held by the owner;

(iv) The limitations set forth in this subsection are limitations on
the benefits for which the association is obligated before taking into account
either its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to which those
benefits could be provided out of the assets of the impaired or insolvent
insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the association's obligations
under the act may be met by the use of assets attributable to covered policies
or reimbursed to the association pursuant to its subrogation and assignment
rights.

(4) In performing its obligations to provide coverage under section
44-2707, the association shall not be required to guarantee, assume, reinsure,
or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, reinsured, or performed, the
contractual obligations of the insolvent or impaired insurer under a covered
policy or contract that do not materially affect the economic values or economic
benefits of the covered policy or contract.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 593, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 360, § 15;

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB887, § 17.